Washington statutes.
RCW 28B.50.520

Federal funds, receipt of authorized.

The college board or any board of trustees is authorized to receive federal funds made available for the assistance of community and technical colleges, and providing physical facilities, maintenance or operation of schools, or for any educational purposes, according to the provisions of the acts of congress making such funds available.

[ 1991 c 238 s 57; 1969 ex.s. c 223 s 28B.50.520. Prior: 1967 ex.s. c 8 s 52. Formerly RCW 28.85.520.]

NOTES:

Construction of chapter when part thereof in conflict with federal requirements which are condition precedent to allocation of federal funds: RCW 28B.50.440.